mn_MN/mn_MN.aff
FLAG long
SFX g0 Y 10
SFX g0 0 -ын .
SFX g0 0 -ынх/70 .
SFX g0 0 -ынхан/70 .
SFX g0 0 -т/00 .
SFX g0 0 -ыг/00 .
SFX g0 0 -аа .
SFX g0 0 -аас/00 .
SFX g0 0 -аар/00 .
SFX g0 0 -тай/70 .
SFX g0 0 -гүй/73 .

SFX g1 Y 10
SFX g1 0 -ын .
SFX g1 0 -ынх/71 .
SFX g1 0 -ынхон/71 .
SFX g1 0 -т/01 .
SFX g1 0 -ыг/01 .
SFX g1 0 -оо .
SFX g1 0 -оос/01 .
SFX g1 0 -оор/01 .
SFX g1 0 -той/71 .
SFX g1 0 -гүй/73 .

SFX g2 Y 10
SFX g2 0 -ийн .
SFX g2 0 -ийнх/72 .
SFX g2 0 -ийнхөн/72 .
SFX g2 0 -т/02 .
SFX g2 0 -ийг/02 .
SFX g2 0 -өө .
SFX g2 0 -өөс/02 .
SFX g2 0 -өөр/02 .
SFX g2 0 -тэй/72 .
SFX g2 0 -гүй/73 .

SFX g3 Y 10
SFX g3 0 -ийн .
SFX g3 0 -ийнх/73 .
SFX g3 0 -ийнхэн/73 .
SFX g3 0 -т/03 .
SFX g3 0 -ийг/03 .
SFX g3 0 -ээ .
SFX g3 0 -ээс/03 .
SFX g3 0 -ээр/03 .
SFX g3 0 -тэй/73 .
SFX g3 0 -гүй/73 .

SFX h0 Y 10
SFX h0 0 -ы .
SFX h0 0 -ых/70 .
SFX h0 0 -ыхан/70 .
SFX h0 0 -д/00 .
SFX h0 0 -ыг/00 .
SFX h0 0 -аа .
SFX h0 0 -аас/00 .
SFX h0 0 -аар/00 .
SFX h0 0 -тай/70 .
SFX h0 0 -гүй/73 .

SFX h1 Y 10
SFX h1 0 -ы .
SFX h1 0 -ых/71 .
SFX h1 0 -ыхон/71 .
SFX h1 0 -д/01 .
SFX h1 0 -ыг/01 .
SFX h1 0 -оо .
SFX h1 0 -оос/01 .
SFX h1 0 -оор/01 .
SFX h1 0 -той/71 .
SFX h1 0 -гүй/73 .

SFX h2 Y 10
SFX h2 0 -ий .
SFX h2 0 -ийх/72 .
SFX h2 0 -ийхөн/72 .
SFX h2 0 -д/02 .
SFX h2 0 -ийг/02 .
SFX h2 0 -өө .
SFX h2 0 -өөс/02 .
SFX h2 0 -өөр/02 .
SFX h2 0 -тэй/72 .
SFX h2 0 -гүй/73 .

SFX h3 Y 10
SFX h3 0 -ий .
SFX h3 0 -ийх/73 .
SFX h3 0 -ийхэн/73 .
SFX h3 0 -д/03 .
SFX h3 0 -ийг/03 .
SFX h3 0 -ээ .
SFX h3 0 -ээс/03 .
SFX h3 0 -ээр/03 .
SFX h3 0 -тэй/73 .
SFX h3 0 -гүй/73 .

SFX i0 Y 10
SFX i0 0 -ийн .
SFX i0 0 -ийнх/70 .
SFX i0 0 -ийнхан/70 .
SFX i0 0 -д/00 .
SFX i0 0 -г/00 .
SFX i0 0 -аас/00 .
SFX i0 0 -аа .
SFX i0 0 -аар/00 .
SFX i0 0 -тай/70 .
SFX i0 0 -гүй/73 .

SFX i1 Y 10
SFX i1 0 -ийн .
SFX i1 0 -ийнх/71 .
SFX i1 0 -ийнхон/71 .
SFX i1 0 -д/01 .
SFX i1 0 -г/01 .
SFX i1 0 -оос/01 .
SFX i1 0 -оо .
SFX i1 0 -оор/01 .
SFX i1 0 -той/71 .
SFX i1 0 -гүй/73 .

SFX i2 Y 10
SFX i2 0 -ийн .
SFX i2 0 -ийнх/72 .
SFX i2 0 -ийнхөн/72 .
SFX i2 0 -д/02 .
SFX i2 0 -г/02 .
SFX i2 0 -өөс/02 .
SFX i2 0 -өө .
SFX i2 0 -өөр/02 .
SFX i2 0 -тэй/72 .
SFX i2 0 -гүй/73 .

SFX i3 Y 10
SFX i3 0 -ийн .
SFX i3 0 -ийнх/73 .
SFX i3 0 -ийнхэн/73 .
SFX i3 0 -д/03 .
SFX i3 0 -г/03 .
SFX i3 0 -ээс/03 .
SFX i3 0 -ээ .
SFX i3 0 -ээр/03 .
SFX i3 0 -тэй/73 .
SFX i3 0 -гүй/73 .

SFX k0 Y 10
SFX k0 0 -ийн .
SFX k0 0 -ийнх/70 .
SFX k0 0 -ийнхан/70 .
SFX k0 0 -т/00 .
SFX k0 0 -ийг/00 .
SFX k0 0 -аа .
SFX k0 0 -аас/00 .
SFX k0 0 -аар/00 .
SFX k0 0 -тай/70 .
SFX k0 0 -гүй/73 .

SFX k1 Y 10
SFX k1 0 -ийн .
SFX k1 0 -ийнх/71 .
SFX k1 0 -ийнхон/71 .
SFX k1 0 -т/01 .
SFX k1 0 -ийг/01 .
SFX k1 0 -оо .
SFX k1 0 -оос/01 .
SFX k1 0 -оор/01 .
SFX k1 0 -той/71 .
SFX k1 0 -гүй/73 .

SFX k2 Y 10
SFX k2 0 -ийн .
SFX k2 0 -ийнх/72 .
SFX k2 0 -ийнхөн/72 .
SFX k2 0 -т/02 .
SFX k2 0 -ийг/02 .
SFX k2 0 -өө .
SFX k2 0 -өөс/02 .
SFX k2 0 -өөр/02 .
SFX k2 0 -тэй/72 .
SFX k2 0 -гүй/73 .

SFX k3 Y 10
SFX k3 0 -ийн .
SFX k3 0 -ийнх/73 .
SFX k3 0 -ийнхэн/73 .
SFX k3 0 -т/03 .
SFX k3 0 -ийг/03 .
SFX k3 0 -ээ .
SFX k3 0 -ээс/03 .
SFX k3 0 -ээр/03 .
SFX k3 0 -тэй/73 .
SFX k3 0 -гүй/73 .

SFX l0 Y 10
SFX l0 0 -ны .
SFX l0 0 -ных/70 .
SFX l0 0 -ныхан/70 .
SFX l0 0 -д/00 .
SFX l0 0 -ийг/00 .
SFX l0 0 -аас/00 .
SFX l0 0 -аа .
SFX l0 0 -аар/00 .
SFX l0 0 -тай/70 .
SFX l0 0 -гүй/73 .

SFX l1 Y 10
SFX l1 0 -ны .
SFX l1 0 -ных/71 .
SFX l1 0 -ныхон/71 .
SFX l1 0 -д/01 .
SFX l1 0 -ийг/01 .
SFX l1 0 -оос/01 .
SFX l1 0 -оо .
SFX l1 0 -оор/01 .
SFX l1 0 -той/71 .
SFX l1 0 -гүй/73 .

SFX l2 Y 10
SFX l2 0 -ний .
SFX l2 0 -нийх/72 .
SFX l2 0 -нийхөн/72 .
SFX l2 0 -д/02 .
SFX l2 0 -ийг/02 .
SFX l2 0 -өөс/02 .
SFX l2 0 -өө .
SFX l2 0 -өөр/02 .
SFX l2 0 -тэй/72 .
SFX l2 0 -гүй/73 .

SFX l3 Y 10
SFX l3 0 -ний .
SFX l3 0 -нийх/73 .
SFX l3 0 -нийхэн/73 .
SFX l3 0 -д/03 .
SFX l3 0 -ийг/03 .
SFX l3 0 -ээс/03 .
SFX l3 0 -ээ .
SFX l3 0 -ээр/03 .
SFX l3 0 -тэй/73 .
SFX l3 0 -гүй/73 .

SFX m0 Y 8
SFX m0 0 -рын .
SFX m0 0 -рынх/70 .
SFX m0 0 -рт/00 .
SFX m0 0 -рыг/00 .
SFX m0 0 -раа .
SFX m0 0 -раас/00 .
SFX m0 0 -раар/00 .
SFX m0 0 -р/0408 .

SFX m3 Y 8
SFX m3 0 -рийн .
SFX m3 0 -рийнх/73 .
SFX m3 0 -рт/03 .
SFX m3 0 -рийг/03 .
SFX m3 0 -рээ .
SFX m3 0 -рээс/03 .
SFX m3 0 -рээр/03 .
SFX m3 0 -р/0708 .

SFX m1 Y 2
SFX m1 0 -ууд/040870 .
SFX m1 0 -уудынх/040870 .

SFX m2 Y 2
SFX m2 0 -үүд/070873 .
SFX m2 0 -үүдийнх/070873 .

SFX o0 Y 8
SFX o0 0 -ны .
SFX o0 0 -ных/70 .
SFX o0 0 -ныхан/70 .
SFX o0 0 -нд/00 .
SFX o0 0 -ныг/00 .
SFX o0 0 -наас/00 .
SFX o0 0 -наар/00 .
SFX o0 0 -н/0408 .

SFX o1 Y 8
SFX o1 0 -ны .
SFX o1 0 -ных/71 .
SFX o1 0 -ныхон/71 .
SFX o1 0 -нд/01 .
SFX o1 0 -ныг/01 .
SFX o1 0 -ноос/01 .
SFX o1 0 -ноор/01 .
SFX o1 0 -н/0508 .

SFX o2 Y 8
SFX o2 0 -ний .
SFX o2 0 -нийх/72 .
SFX o2 0 -нийхөн/72 .
SFX o2 0 -нд/02 .
SFX o2 0 -нийг/02 .
SFX o2 0 -нөөс/02 .
SFX o2 0 -нөөр/02 .
SFX o2 0 -н/0608 .

SFX o3 Y 8
SFX o3 0 -ний .
SFX o3 0 -нийх/73 .
SFX o3 0 -нийхэн/73 .
SFX o3 0 -нд/03 .
SFX o3 0 -нийг/03 .
SFX o3 0 -нээс/03 .
SFX o3 0 -нээр/03 .
SFX o3 0 -н/0708 .

SFX p0 Y 7
SFX p0 0 -аадынх/70 .
SFX p0 0 -аадад/00 .
SFX p0 0 -аадыг/00 .
SFX p0 0 -аадын/00 .
SFX p0 0 -аадаас/00 .
SFX p0 0 -аадаар/00 .
SFX p0 0 -аад/0408 .

SFX p1 Y 7
SFX p1 0 -оодынх/71 .
SFX p1 0 -оодод/01 .
SFX p1 0 -оодыг/01 .
SFX p1 0 -оодын/01 .
SFX p1 0 -оодоос/01 .
SFX p1 0 -оодоор/01 .
SFX p1 0 -оод/0508 .

SFX p2 Y 7
SFX p2 0 -өөдийнх/72 .
SFX p2 0 -өөдөд/02 .
SFX p2 0 -өөдийг/02 .
SFX p2 0 -өөдийн/02 .
SFX p2 0 -өөдөөс/02 .
SFX p2 0 -өөдөөр/02 .
SFX p2 0 -өөд/0608 .

SFX p3 Y 7
SFX p3 0 -ээдийнх/73 .
SFX p3 0 -ээдэд/03 .
SFX p3 0 -ээдийг/03 .
SFX p3 0 -ээдийн/03 .
SFX p3 0 -ээдээс/03 .
SFX p3 0 -ээдээр/03 .
SFX p3 0 -ээд/0708 .

SFX A0 Y 39
SFX A0 0 /0408 .
SFX A0 0 а [^аяиу]а
SFX A0 0 а [ия]
SFX A0 0 аа [^йьяауие]
SFX A0 0 аар/00 [^аийуьяе]
SFX A0 0 аас/00 н
SFX A0 0 ан [^аийяуьенжчш]
SFX A0 0 анд/00 [^аийяуьенжчш]
SFX A0 0 ар/00 [^аяиу][аи]
SFX A0 0 ар/00 я
SFX A0 0 ас/00 я
SFX A0 0 г/00 [иауяюе][айу]
SFX A0 0 гаар/00 [иауяюе][айу]
SFX A0 0 гаас/00 й
SFX A0 0 д/00 [йян]
SFX A0 0 ийг/00 [жчшкг]
SFX A0 0 ин [жчш]
SFX A0 0 инд/00 [жчш]
SFX A0 0 йг/00 и
SFX A0 0 н [аийу]
SFX A0 0 наас/00 [^йьня]
SFX A0 0 нд/00 [аиу]
SFX A0 0 нх/040870 й
SFX A0 0 ны [^йьян]
SFX A0 0 ных/040870 [^йьян]
SFX A0 0 ы н
SFX A0 0 ыг/00 [^аийуьежчшкг]
SFX A0 0 ын я
SFX A0 0 ынх/040870 я
SFX A0 0 ых/040870 н
SFX A0 а ыг/00 [^аяиу]а
SFX A0 ь иа ь
SFX A0 ь иар/00 ь
SFX A0 ь ийг/00 ь
SFX A0 ь ин ь
SFX A0 ь инаас/00 ь
SFX A0 ь инд/00 ь
SFX A0 ь ины ь
SFX A0 ь иных/040870 ь

SFX A1 Y 39
SFX A1 0 /0508 .
SFX A1 0 г/01 [иоуёюе][ойу]
SFX A1 0 гоор/01 [иоуёюе][ойу]
SFX A1 0 гоос/01 й
SFX A1 0 д/01 [йён]
SFX A1 0 ийг/01 [жчшкг]
SFX A1 0 ин [жчш]
SFX A1 0 инд/01 [жчш]
SFX A1 0 йг/01 и
SFX A1 0 н [оийу]
SFX A1 0 нд/01 [оиу]
SFX A1 0 ноос/01 [^йьнё]
SFX A1 0 нх/050871 й
SFX A1 0 ны [^йьён]
SFX A1 0 ных/050871 [^йьён]
SFX A1 0 о [^оёиу]о
SFX A1 0 о [иё]
SFX A1 0 он [^оуийёьенжчш]
SFX A1 0 онд/01 [^оуийёьенжчш]
SFX A1 0 оо [^оийуьёе]
SFX A1 0 оор/01 [^оийуьёе]
SFX A1 0 оос/01 н
SFX A1 0 ор/01 [^оёиу][ои]
SFX A1 0 ор/01 ё
SFX A1 0 ос/01 ё
SFX A1 0 ы н
SFX A1 0 ыг/01 [^оийуьежчшкг]
SFX A1 0 ын ё
SFX A1 0 ынх/050871 ё
SFX A1 0 ых/050871 н
SFX A1 о ыг/01 [^оёиу]о
SFX A1 ь ийг/01 ь
SFX A1 ь ин ь
SFX A1 ь инд/01 ь
SFX A1 ь иноос/01 ь
SFX A1 ь ины ь
SFX A1 ь иных/050871 ь
SFX A1 ь ио ь
SFX A1 ь иор/01 ь

SFX A2 Y 30
SFX A2 0 /0608 .
SFX A2 0 г/02 [иөэүею][өйү]
SFX A2 0 гөөр/02 [иөэүею][өйү]
SFX A2 0 гөөс/02 й
SFX A2 0 д/02 [йен]
SFX A2 0 ий н
SFX A2 0 ийг/02 [^өийү]
SFX A2 0 ийн е
SFX A2 0 ийнх/060872 е
SFX A2 0 ийх/060872 н
SFX A2 0 ин [жчш]
SFX A2 0 инд/02 [жчш]
SFX A2 0 йг/02 и
SFX A2 0 н [өүий]
SFX A2 0 нд/02 [өиү]
SFX A2 0 ний [^йен]
SFX A2 0 нийх/060872 [^йен]
SFX A2 0 нөөс/02 [^йне]
SFX A2 0 нх/060872 й
SFX A2 0 ө [^өеиү]ө
SFX A2 0 ө [ие]
SFX A2 0 өн [^өүийенжчш]
SFX A2 0 өнд/02 [^өүийенжчш]
SFX A2 0 өө [^өийүе]
SFX A2 0 өөр/02 [^өийүе]
SFX A2 0 өөс/02 н
SFX A2 0 өр/02 [^өеиү][өи]
SFX A2 0 өр/02 е
SFX A2 0 өс/02 е
SFX A2 ө ийг/02 [^өеиү]ө

SFX A3 Y 30
SFX A3 0 /0708 .
SFX A3 0 г/03 [иэүею][эйү]
SFX A3 0 гээр/03 [иэүею][эйү]
SFX A3 0 гээс/03 й
SFX A3 0 д/03 [йен]
SFX A3 0 ий н
SFX A3 0 ийг/03 [^эийү]
SFX A3 0 ийн е
SFX A3 0 ийнх/070873 е
SFX A3 0 ийх/070873 н
SFX A3 0 ин [жчш]
SFX A3 0 инд/03 [жчш]
SFX A3 0 йг/03 и
SFX A3 0 н [эиүй]
SFX A3 0 нд/03 [эиү]
SFX A3 0 ний [^йен]
SFX A3 0 нийх/070873 [^йен]
SFX A3 0 нх/070873 й
SFX A3 0 нээс/03 [^йне]
SFX A3 0 э [^эеиү]э
SFX A3 0 э [ие]
SFX A3 0 эн [^эүийенжчш]
SFX A3 0 энд/03 [^эүийенжчш]
SFX A3 0 эр/03 [^эеиү][эи]
SFX A3 0 эр/03 е
SFX A3 0 эс/03 е
SFX A3 0 ээ [^эийүе]
SFX A3 0 ээр/03 [^эийүе]
SFX A3 0 ээс/03 н
SFX A3 э ийг/03 [^эеиү]э

SFX A4 Y 95
SFX A4 би миний би
SFX A4 би минийх/070873 би
SFX A4 би надад/00 би
SFX A4 би над/040800 би
SFX A4 би намайг/00 би
SFX A4 би надаас/00 би
SFX A4 би надаар/00 би
SFX A4 0 ний [бт].д
SFX A4 0 нийг/03 [бт].д
SFX A4 0 нийд/03 [бт].д
SFX A4 0 нийх/070873 [бт].д
SFX A4 0 энд/03 [бт].д
SFX A4 0 нээс/03 [бт].д
SFX A4 0 нээ [бт].д
SFX A4 0 нээр/03 [бт].д
SFX A4 0 эн/0708 [бт].д
SFX A4 0 ний эд
SFX A4 0 нийг/03 эд
SFX A4 0 нийд/03 эд
SFX A4 0 нийх/070873 эд
SFX A4 0 энд/03 эд
SFX A4 0 нээс/03 эд
SFX A4 0 нээ эд
SFX A4 0 нээр/03 эд
SFX A4 0 эн/0708 эд
SFX A4 0 ний чи
SFX A4 0 нийх/070873 чи
SFX A4 и амд/00 чи
SFX A4 и амайг/00 чи
SFX A4 и амаар/00 чи
SFX A4 и амаас/00 чи
SFX A4 и ам/0408 чи
SFX A4 0 ны та
SFX A4 0 ныг/00 та
SFX A4 0 ных/040870 та
SFX A4 0 нд/00 та
SFX A4 0 наас/00 та
SFX A4 0 наа та
SFX A4 0 наар/00 та
SFX A4 0 н/040700 та
SFX A4 энэ үүний энэ
SFX A4 энэ үүнийх/070873 энэ
SFX A4 энэ үүнд/03 энэ
SFX A4 энэ үүнийг/03 энэ
SFX A4 энэ үүнээс/03 энэ
SFX A4 энэ үүгээр/03 энэ
SFX A4 энэ үүн/070873 энэ
SFX A4 энэ ийш энэ
SFX A4 энэ ийшээ/03 энэ
SFX A4 0 ээр тэр
SFX A4 0 ээ тэр
SFX A4 эр үүний тэр
SFX A4 эр үүнийх/070873 тэр
SFX A4 эр үүнд/03 тэр
SFX A4 эр үүнийг/03 тэр
SFX A4 эр үүнээс/03 тэр
SFX A4 эр үүнээ тэр
SFX A4 эр үүгээр/03 тэр
SFX A4 эр үүн/070873 тэр
SFX A4 эр ийш тэр
SFX A4 эр ийшээ/03 тэр
SFX A4 0 х/040870 [мт]анай
SFX A4 0 д/00 [мт]анай
SFX A4 0 хаас/00 [мт]анай
SFX A4 0 хаар/00 [мт]анай
SFX A4 0 /0408 [мт]анай
SFX A4 0 ний өдий
SFX A4 0 нийх/060872 өдий
SFX A4 0 д/02 өдий
SFX A4 0 г/02 өдий
SFX A4 0 гөөс/02 өдий
SFX A4 0 гөө өдий
SFX A4 0 гөөр/02 өдий
SFX A4 0 /0608 өдий
SFX A4 0 лөн төдий
SFX A4 0 д/00 мань
SFX A4 ь иас/00 мань
SFX A4 ь иа мань
SFX A4 ь иар/00 мань
SFX A4 0 /0408 мань
SFX A4 0 д/02 өдөн
SFX A4 0 г/02 өдөн
SFX A4 өн нөөс/02 өдөн
SFX A4 өн нөөр/02 өдөн
SFX A4 0 /0508 өдөн
SFX A4 0 ний хэзээ
SFX A4 0 нийх/070873 хэзээ
SFX A4 0 д/03 хэзээ
SFX A4 0 нээс/03 хэзээ
SFX A4 0 нээ хэзээ
SFX A4 0 на хаа
SFX A4 0 нах/040870 хаа
SFX A4 0 наас/00 хаа
SFX A4 0 наа хаа
SFX A4 0 гуур/00 хаа

SFX A5 Y 9
SFX A5 0 /0408 .
SFX A5 0 аа уул
SFX A5 0 аар/00 уул
SFX A5 0 ан уул
SFX A5 0 анд/00 уул
SFX A5 0 наас/00 уул
SFX A5 0 ыг/00 уул
SFX A5 0 ын уул
SFX A5 0 ынх/040870 уул

SFX 5A Y 2
SFX 5A 0 ууд/040870 уул
SFX 5A 0 уудынх/040870 уул
